Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5208
Board; meetings; application; approval; deadline.

The board shall meet at least twice during the year. The board shall review pending applications in order to approve and certify beginning farmers and livestock producers as eligible for the programs provided by the board, to approve and certify owners of agricultural assets as eligible for the tax credits authorized by sections 77-5211 to 77-5213, and to approve and certify qualified beginning farmers and livestock producers as eligible for the tax credit authorized by section 77-5209.01 and for qualification to claim an exemption of taxable tangible personal property as provided by section 77-5209.02. No new applications for any such programs, tax credits, or exemptions shall be approved or certified by the board after December 31, 2027. Any action taken by the board regarding approval and certification of program eligibility, granting of tax credits, or termination of rental agreements shall require the affirmative vote of at least four members of the board.

Laws 1999, LB 630, § 9;

Laws 2006, LB 990, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB1027, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB538, § 12;

Laws 2016, LB1022, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB432, § 15;

Laws 2023, LB562, § 15.